Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.041

Ad hoc advisory committees.

The director may establish ad hoc advisory committees, as necessary, to assist in the development of policies to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1995 c 269 s 1302.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.